Utah statutes.
39-7-102.   Definitions.
(1)  "Dependent" means the spouse and children of a service member or any
other person dependent upon the service member for support.
(2)  "Interest" includes service charges, renewal charges, fees, or any other
charges in respect to any obligation or liability.
(3)  "Military service" means active, full-time service with a recognized
military unit called into service by the governor for at least 30 days.
(4)  "Service member" means any member of the National Guard serving on active
military service in an organized military unit.
